Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-609
County board; lease; disposal; powers.

The governing body of any county authorized by section 3-601 to acquire an aviation field shall have power to lease or dispose of the same or any portion thereof when the public need will not thereby be injured.

Laws 1969, c. 141, § 9, p. 650.